local/incubator/apertium-br-fr.br.dix
    <pardef n="d/ant__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ant</l>
          <r>ant<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r>ant<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="lizh/er__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iri</l>
          <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kend/erv__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erv</l>
          <r>erv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irvi</l>
          <r>erv<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kr/oc’hen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oc’hen</l>
          <r>oc’hen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ec’hin</l>
          <r>oc’hen<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="kr/ogen__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ogen</l>
          <r>ogen<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>egin</l>
          <r>ogen<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="dam__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ilin__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>daou</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hou/ad__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ad</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>idi</l>
          <r>ad<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bele/g__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ien</l>
          <r>g<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Roazhon__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="Yann__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Adjectifs -->
    <pardef n="heñvel__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="bras__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oc’h</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>añ</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>at</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="excl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- Verbes -->

    <pardef n="/bezañ__vblex">
      <e>
        <par n="initial-b"/>
        <p>
          <l>ezañ</l>
          <r>ezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>out</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eo</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>omp</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oc’h</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>int</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>voen</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>voes</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>voe</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>voemp</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>voec’h</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>voent</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oan</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oas</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oa</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oamp</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oac’h</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oant</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bet</l>
          <r>bezañ<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/ober__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ober</l>
          <r>ober<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ran</l>
          <r>ober<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rez</l>
          <r>ober<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ober<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reomp</l>
          <r>ober<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rit</l>
          <r>ober<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>reont</l>
          <r>ober<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="amezeg"><i>ameze</i><par n="bele/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="beleg"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ele</i><par n="bele/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dant"><par n="initial-d"/><i/><par n="d/ant__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dimezell"><par n="initial-d"/><i>imezell</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwenneg"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>enne</i><par n="bele/g__n"/></e>
    <e lm="houad"><i>hou</i><par n="hou/ad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ilin"><i>ilin</i><par n="ilin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kenderv"><i>kend</i><par n="kend/erv__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kroc’hen"><i>kr</i><par n="kr/oc’hen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="krogen"><i>kr</i><par n="kr/ogen__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lagad"><i>lagad</i><par n="ilin__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lizher"><i>lizh</i><par n="lizh/er__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maouez"><par n="initial-m"/><i>aouez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="merc’h"><par n="initial-m"/><i>erc’h</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moereb"><par n="initial-m"/><i>oereb</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="naer"><i>naer</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plac’h"><par n="initial-p"/><i>lac’h</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alamandezenn"><i>alamandezenn</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aouravalenn"><i>aouravalenn</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baot"><par n="initial-b"/><i>aot</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dam"><par n="initial-d"/><i>am</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="denez"><par n="initial-d"/><i>enez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dimezell"><par n="initial-d"/><i>imezell</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwennelenn"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ennelenn</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwennel"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ennel</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwennidell"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ennidell</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwennili"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>ennili</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gwerc’hez"><par n="initial-gw"/><i>erc’hez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="intañvez"><i>intañvez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kraoñenn"><par n="initial-k"/><i>raoñenn</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mammstamperezh"><par n="initial-m"/><i>ammstamperezh</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maouez"><par n="initial-m"/><i>aouez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="merc’heg"><par n="initial-m"/><i>erc’heg</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="merc’h"><par n="initial-m"/><i>erc’h</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="morgazhenn"><par n="initial-m"/><i>orgazhenn</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nijerez"><i>nijerez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="orañjezenn"><i>orañjezenn</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parez"><par n="initial-p"/><i>arez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pikerez"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ikerez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plac’h"><par n="initial-p"/><i>lac’h</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pouezerez"><par n="initial-p"/><i>ouezerez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ran"><i>ran</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rouanez"><i>rouanez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sec’henn"><i>sec’henn</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seurez"><i>seurez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skendilig"><i>skendilig</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sonderez"><i>sonderez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sonerez"><i>sonerez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="splujerez"><i>splujerez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stlejerez"><i>stlejerez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sunerez"><i>sunerez</i><par n="dam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Kemper"><i>Kemper</i><par n="Roazhon__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Roazhon"><i>Roazhon</i><par n="Roazhon__np"/></e>
    <e lm="Yann"><i>Yann</i><par n="Yann__np"/></e>
    <e lm="bras"><par n="initial-b"/><i>ras</i><par n="bras__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kosh"><par n="initial-k"/><i>osh</i><par n="bras__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="drouk"><par n="initial-d"/><i>rouk</i><par n="bras__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="sec’h"><i>sec’h</i><par n="bras__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="plijus"><par n="initial-p"/><i>lijus</i><par n="heñvel__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="trist"><par n="initial-t"/><i>rist</i><par n="heñvel__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="heñvel"><i>heñvel</i><par n="heñvel__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bezañ"><i/><par n="/bezañ__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ober"><i/><par n="/ober__vblex"/></e>
